Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.185

Outpatient services—Cost studies—Vendor rates.

The department of social and health services shall assist the nursing home industry in researching the costs of outpatient services allowed under RCW 18.51.180. Such cost studies shall be utilized by the department in the determination of reasonable vendor rates for nursing homes offering such services to insure an adequate return to the nursing homes and a cost savings to the state as compared to the cost of institutionalization.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 71 s 2.]